Utah statutes.
4-37-303.   Transportation of live aquatic animals to fee fishing facilities.

(1)  Any person holding a certificate of registration for a fee fishing facility may transport the live aquatic animals specified on the certificate of registration to the facility.

(2)  Each transfer or shipment of live aquatic animals to a fee fishing facility within the state shall be accompanied by documentation of the source and destination of the fish, including:

(a)  name, address, certificate of registration number and health approval number of the source;

(b)  number and weight being shipped by species; and

(c)  name, address, and certificate of registration number of the destination.

